Massachusetts, session 194th, S1369.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 148 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting in line 39 after the words “engaged in agricultural work”, the following:- "and 
employees of nonprofit institutions of higher education." 
SECTION 2. Section 148 of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words "section 27C" in line 116 the following:-  
"With respect to any claim or cause of action seeking any legal or equitable remedy or 
relief commenced on or after July 1, 2024, a nonprofit institution of higher education shall be 
immune from civil liability under claims alleging that the institution’s payment of wages on a 
monthly basis violated this Section."